Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3510
Acquisition by aid of gifts or devises; authorization; powers of county board; conditions.

Counties having thirty-six hundred inhabitants or more are hereby authorized and empowered to (1) accept a gift or devise of or to purchase a building suitable for conversion into such facility or facilities as provided by section 23-3501, (2) purchase real estate and erect a building or buildings thereon for such facility or facilities, and (3) maintain, manage, improve, remodel, equip and operate such facility or facilities. The county board of any county may, in its discretion, accept a gift or devise of a specific sum of money for the purposes above set forth in this section, and by tax levy raise such additional sum of money as may be necessary to remodel, build or acquire such facility or facilities, and support and maintain the same. Before any such gift or devise may be accepted, the same must be approved by the county board, and the total value of all gifts and devises accepted and approved for the original construction or acquisition of such facility or facilities must equal at least fifty percent of the cost of such construction or acquisition before any tax levy can be made for the purposes provided in this section.

Laws 1947, c. 61, § 1, p. 196;

Laws 1963, c. 114, § 10, p. 453;

Laws 1967, c. 121, § 10, p. 391;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.10.